Wyoming, session 2026, HB0116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 41-3-101, 41-3-104 by creating a new
subsection (c), 41-3-931, 41-3-932 by creating a new
subsection (f) and 41-4-503 are amended to read:

41-3-101. Nature of water rights and beneficial use.

(a) A water right is a right to use the water of the
state, when such use has been acquired by the beneficial
HB0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0178
application of water under the laws of the state relating
thereto, and in conformity with the rules and regulations
dependent thereon. Beneficial use shall be the basis, the
measure and limit of the right to use water at all times,
not exceeding the statutory limit except as provided by
W.S. 41-4-317. In addition to any beneficial use specified
by law or rule and regulation promulgated pursuant thereto,
the use of water for the purpose of extracting heat
therefrom is considered a beneficial use subject to prior
rights. Water being always the property of the state,
rights to its use shall attach to the land for irrigation,
or to such other purposes or object for which acquired in
accordance with the beneficial use made for which the right
receives public recognition, under the law and the
administration provided thereby. Water rights for the
direct use of the natural unstored flow of any stream
cannot be detached from the lands, place or purpose for
which they are acquired, except as provided in W.S.
41-3-102 and 41-3-103, pertaining to a change to preferred
use, and except as provided in W.S. 41-4-514.

(b) The destruction of water molecules by separating
the hydrogen and oxygen atoms for the purposes of the
HB0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0178
industrial production of hydrogen shall not constitute a
beneficial use of water. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed to prohibit any use of water that results in
evaporation losses where the primary purpose is not the
molecular destruction or chemical dissociation of water or
any use of wastewater.

41-3-104. Procedure to change use or place of use.

(c) If the water right's source of supply has been
subject to priority regulation within the previous ten (10)
years, or existing uses from the water right's source of
supply have been regulated to comply with an interstate
compact or United States Supreme Court decree within the
previous ten (10) years, the board of control shall deny
any petition that would result in the destruction of water
molecules by separating the hydrogen and oxygen atoms for
the purposes of the industrial production of hydrogen.

41-3-931. Application; when granted generally; denial
subject to review; defects and corrections generally;
cancellation.

HB0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0178
(a) An application for a permit for a well in any
areas not designated as a critical area shall be granted as
a matter of course, if the proposed use is beneficial and,
if the state engineer finds that the proposed means of
diversion and construction are adequate. If the state
engineer finds that to grant the application as a matter of
course, would not be in public's water interest, then he
may deny the application subject to review at the next
meeting of the state board of control. If the state
engineer shall find that the proposed means of diversion or
construction are inadequate, or if the application is
otherwise defective, he may return the application for
correction. If such correction is not made within ninety
(90) days, the state engineer may cancel the application.

(b) If the proposed source of supply has been subject
to priority regulation within the previous ten (10) years,
or existing uses from the proposed source of supply have
been regulated to comply with an interstate compact or
United States Supreme Court decree within the previous ten
(10) years, the state engineer shall deny any application,
petition to amend a permit or application for temporary
transfer that would result in the destruction of water
HB0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0178
molecules by separating the hydrogen and oxygen atoms for
the purposes of the industrial production of hydrogen. This
subsection shall not apply to applications to appropriate
by-product water under W.S. 41-3-904.

41-3-932. Public notice of application or petition;
hearing before state engineer and control area advisory
board; cost.

(f) No petition or application under this section
shall be granted if it would result in the destruction of
water molecules by separating the hydrogen and oxygen atoms
for the purposes of the industrial production of hydrogen.
This subsection shall not apply to applications to
appropriate by-product water under W.S. 41-3-904.

41-4-503. Recordation; approval or rejection
generally.

(a) All applications which shall comply with the
provisions of this chapter, and with the regulations of the
engineer's office, shall be recorded in a suitable book
kept for that purpose; and it shall be the duty of the
HB0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0178
state engineer to approve all applications made in proper
form, which contemplate the application of the water to a
beneficial use and where the proposed use does not tend to
impair the value of existing rights, or be otherwise
detrimental to the public welfare. But where there is no
unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply, or
where the proposed use conflicts with existing rights, or
threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, it
shall be the duty of the state engineer to reject such
application and refuse to issue the permit asked for.

(b) If the proposed source of supply has been subject
to priority regulation within the previous ten (10) years,
or existing uses from the proposed source of supply have
been regulated to comply with an interstate compact or
United States Supreme Court decree within the previous ten
(10) years, the state engineer shall deny any application,
petition to amend a permit or application for temporary
transfer that would result in the destruction of water
molecules by separating the hydrogen and oxygen atoms for
the purposes of the industrial production of hydrogen. This
subsection shall not apply to applications to appropriate
by-product water under W.S. 41-3-904.
HB0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0178

Section 2.

(a) This act shall apply to all new water permit
applications or applications for changes of water use filed
on or after July 1, 2026.

(b) No permit or water right issued before July 1,
2026 shall be construed to authorize the destruction of
water molecules as provided in W.S. 41-3-101(b) as created
by section 1 of this act unless that use was explicitly
permitted or approved under prior law.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0116